Utah statutes.
75-3-808.   Individual liability of personal representative.
(1) Unless otherwise provided in the contract, a personal representative is
not individually liable on a contract properly entered into in his fiduciary
capacity in the course of administration of the estate unless he fails to
reveal his representative capacity and identify the estate in the contract.
(2)  A personal representative is individually liable for obligations arising
from ownership or control of the estate or for torts committed in the course
of administration of the estate only if he is personally at fault.
(3)  Claims based on contracts entered into by a personal representative in
his fiduciary capacity, on obligations arising from ownership or control of
the estate, or on torts committed in the course of estate administration may
be asserted against the estate by proceeding against the personal
representative in his fiduciary capacity, whether or not the personal
representative is individually liable therefor.
(4)  Issues of liability as between the estate and the personal representative
individually may be determined in a proceeding for accounting, surcharge, or
indemnification or other appropriate proceeding.
